Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4093.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 12. (1) A plaintiff or defendant may demand a trial by jury as to the issue of just compensation pursuant to applicable law and court rules. The jury shall consist of must be 6 qualified electors selected pursuant to under chapter 13 of Act No. 236 of the Public Acts of 1961, as amended, being sections 600.1301 to 600.1376 of the Michigan Compiled Laws, the revised judicature act of 1961, 1961 PA 236, MCL 600.1300 to 600.1372, and shall be are governed by court rules applicable to juries in civil cases in circuit court. (2) Unless there is good cause shown to the contrary, there shall must be a separate trial as to just compensation with respect to each parcel. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 1 year after the date it is enacted into law. Enacting section 2. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. ?4091 (request no. H00441'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.